Washington statutes.
RCW 35.59.060

Appropriation and expenditure of public moneys, issuance of general obligation bonds authorized—Procedure.

To carry out the purposes of this chapter any municipality shall have the power to appropriate and/or expend any public moneys available therefor and to issue general obligation bonds within the limitations now or hereafter prescribed by the Constitution and laws of this state. Such general obligation bonds shall be issued and sold as provided in chapter 39.46 RCW. If the governing body of any municipality shall submit a proposition for the approval of general obligation bonds at any general or special election and shall declare in the ordinance or resolution setting forth such proposition that its purpose is the creation of a single integrated multi-purpose community center or a citywide or countywide system of such centers, all pursuant to this chapter, and that the creation of such center or system of centers constitutes a single purpose, such declaration shall be presumed to be correct and, upon the issuance of the bonds, such presumption shall become conclusive. Any such election shall be held pursuant to RCW 39.36.050.

[ 1984 c 186 s 19; 1983 c 167 s 49; 1967 c 110 s 6.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.